Montana, session 2025, HB54.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 39-51-406, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-51-406. Unemployment insurance administration account. (1) There is an account in the
federal special revenue fund to be known as the unemployment insurance administration account. All money
that is deposited, appropriated, or paid into this account is available for appropriation to the department. All
money in the account must be expended solely for the purpose of defraying the costs of administration of this
chapter and costs of administration of other legislation specifically delegated by the legislature to the
department for administration of unemployment insurance laws.
(2) All money received and deposited in the account from the United States or any agency of the
United States pursuant to section 302 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 502, must be expended solely for
the purpose and in the amounts found necessary by the secretary of labor for the proper and efficient
administration of this chapter.
(3) The account consists of:
(a) all money received from the United States or any agency of the United States pursuant to
section 302 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 502, as amended; and
(b) all money, trust funds, supplies, facilities, or services furnished, deposited, paid, and received
from the United States or any agency of the United States that are designated for use in the administration of
the unemployment insurance program.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 54
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 54
(4) Notwithstanding any provisions of this section, all money requisitioned and deposited in this
account pursuant to 39-51-403 through 39-51-405 39-51-404 must remain part of the unemployment insurance
fund and must be used only in accordance with the conditions specified in 39-51-403 through 39-51-405 39-51-
404.
(5) All money in this account must be deposited, administered, and disbursed in the same manner
and under the same conditions and requirements as is provided by law for other accounts. The balance in this
account may not lapse at any time but must be continuously available to the department for expenditure
consistent with this chapter.
(6) Any reference to the unemployment insurance administration fund in this code means the
unemployment insurance administration account in the federal special revenue fund."
Section 2. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is repealed:
39-51-405. Signatures required on warrants.
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 54
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 54, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 54
INTRODUCED BY G. PARRY
BY REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
AN ACT REMOVING THE REQUIREMENT FOR THE COUNTERSIGNATURE OF THE COMMISSIONER OF
THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY ON WARRANTS FOR PAYMENT FROM THE
UNEMPLOYMENT TRUST FUND; AMENDING SECTION 39-51-406, MCA; REPEALING SECTION 39-51-405,
MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”